Utah statutes.
65A-8-308.   Enforcement -- Prosecution of violations.

(1)  County sheriffs, police, and other law enforcement officers within their respective jurisdictions are responsible for the enforcement of this part.

(2)  The county attorney or district attorney shall prosecute any violation of this part.

